Maryland, session 2026, HB0343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–304.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “APPROVED HOUSING COUNSELING AGENCY” MEANS AN
ORGANIZATION THAT IS APPROVED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
URBAN DEVELOPMENT TO PROVIDE HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES DIRECTLY OR
THROUGH AFFILIATES OR BRANCHES.
(3) “COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ENTITY
THAT MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS OF § 6–203 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “HOUSING COUNSELING” MEANS COUNSELOR–TO–CLIENT
ASSISTANCE THAT ADDRESSES UNIQUE FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES OR HOUSING
ISSUES AND FOCUSES ON WAYS OF OVERCOMING SPECIFIC OBSTACLES TO
ACHIEVING A HOUSING GOAL.
– 1 –

Ch. 64 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) AS A CONDITION ON THE RECEIPT OF FUNDING FROM THE
DEPARTMENT FROM THE STRATEGIC DEMOLITION FUND OR THE BALTIMORE
VACANTS REINVESTMENT INITIATIVE FOR ANY PROJECT TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE,
OR REHABILITATE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY FOR USE AS HOUSING SINGLE–FAMILY
HOMEOWNERSHIP, A FUNDING RECIPIENT SHALL AGREE TO OFFER PROVIDE
INFORMATION ABOUT THE HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES THAT ARE AVAILABLE
THROUGH THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT TO
PROSPECTIVE RESIDENTS BEFORE THE EXECUTION OF A CONTRACT TO PURCHASE
THE PROPERTY.
(C) HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES OFFERED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED BY HOUSING COUNSELORS CERTIFIED BY THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT AND EMPLOYED BY AN
APPROVED HOUSING COUNSELING AGENCY.
(D) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL APPROPRIATE $200,000 $90,000 TO BE USED BY COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATIONS TO PARTNER WITH APPROVED HOUSING
COUNSELING AGENCIES PROVIDING HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –